Maryland, session 2026, SB0298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment.
Italics indicate opposite chamber/conference co mm i tte e a m en dm en ts*. sb0298*

SENATE BILL 298
Article – State Finance and Procurement
4–601.
(a) Subject to subsection [(b)] (C) of this section, the Department has
STATEWIDE jurisdiction over and full police authority for the enforcement of the criminal
laws and the parking and motor vehicle laws as to the operation, maintenance, and
protection of:
(1) [buildings and grounds that, on June 30, 1984, were administered by
the Office of Annapolis Public Buildings and Grounds, and extending to the surrounding
area that encompasses 1,000 feet in any direction from the boundary of those buildings and
grounds;
(2) buildings and grounds that, on June 30, 1984, were administered by the
Office of Baltimore Public Buildings and Grounds, and extending to the surrounding area
that encompasses 1,000 feet in any direction from the boundary of those buildings and
grounds;
(3) multiservice centers designated by law or by the Board of Public Works
and extending to the surrounding area that encompasses 1,000 feet in any direction from
the boundary of those multiservice centers;
(4) buildings and grounds that, on June 30, 2019, were administered by the
Maryland Department of Labor, and extending to the surrounding area that encompasses
1,000 feet in any direction from the boundary of those buildings;
(5)] State–owned or State–leased buildings and grounds and extending to
the surrounding area that encompasses [1,000] 2,000 feet in any direction from the
boundary of those buildings and grounds; and
[(6)] (2) other public improvements or grounds designated by law or by
the Board of Public Works.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AND
IN ADDITION TO THE POWERS CONFERRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, A POLICE OFFICER OF THE MARYLAND CAPITOL POLICE WITHIN THE
DEPARTMENT MAY INVESTIGATE AND OTHERWISE ENFORCE STATEWIDE THE
CRIMINAL LAWS, TITLE 12 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE, AND PARKING
AND MOTOR VEHICLE LAWS.
(2) IF A POLICE OFFICER OF THE MARYLAND CAPITOL POLICE
WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT EXERCISES THE POWERS GRANTED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, NOTIFICATION OF THE INVESTIGATION AND

SENATE BILL 298 3
ENFORCEMENT SHALL BE PROVIDED AS SOON AS REASONABLY PRACTICABLE AND
AS APPLICABLE TO:
(I) TO THE SECRETARY OF STATE POLICE OR THE DESIGNEE
OF THE SECRETARY, REASONABLY IN ADVANCE OF THE INVESTIGATION OR
ENFORCEMENT, UNLESS AN EMERGENCY OR EXIGENCY EXISTS; AND
(II) TO THE FOLLOWING, AS APPLICABLE, AFTER THE
INVESTIGATION OR ENFORCEMENT:
(I) 1. THE CHIEF OF POLICE OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY LISTED IN § 1–101(C)(1)(II) OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE OR THE
DESIGNEE OF THE CHIEF OF POLICE;
(II) 2. IN A COUNTY IN WHICH THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE
POLICE PROVIDES GENERAL LAW ENFORCEMENT:
1. A. THE COMMANDER OF THE LOCAL BARRACKS FOR THE
DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE OR THE DESIGNEE OF THE COMMANDER; AND
2. B. THE SECRETARY OF STATE POLICE OR THE
DESIGNEE OF THE SECRETARY;
(III) 3. IN BALTIMORE CITY:
1. A. THE POLICE COMMISSIONER OR THE DESIGNEE OF
THE POLICE COMMISSIONER; AND
2. B. THE SHERIFF OR THE DESIGNEE OF THE SHERIFF;
AND
(IV) 1. 4. A. THE SECRETARY OF STATE POLICE OR THE
DESIGNEE OF THE SECRETARY;
2. B. THE CHIEF OF POLICE OF THE MARYLAND TRANSIT
ADMINISTRATION POLICE FORCE OR THE DESIGNEE OF THE CHIEF;
3. C. THE CHIEF OF POLICE OF THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH SECURED TRANSPORT AND INVESTIGATION UNIT OR
THE DESIGNEE OF THE CHIEF; AND

SENATE BILL 298
4. D. THE SUPERINTENDENT OF THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES POLICE OR THE DESIGNEE OF THE
SUPERINTENDENT.
(3) NOTIFICATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH ADOPTED STATE
REGULATIONS, POLICIES, PROCEDURES, AND MEMORANDA OF UNDERSTANDING.
[(b)] (C) Consistent with Article 8 of the Maryland Declaration of Rights, with
respect to State legislative buildings in the City of Annapolis, the presiding officers of the
General Assembly shall have final authority over the use of and access to the buildings by
the members of the General Assembly, their staff, and Department of Legislative Services
personnel.
4–605.
(a) (1) In accordance with the provisions of the State Personnel and Pensions
Article, the Secretary may establish a police and security force, known as the Maryland
Capitol Police of the Department of General Services, WITH STATEWIDE JURISDICTION
to protect PUBLIC OFFICIALS, people, and property [on or about improvements, grounds,
and multiservice centers under the jurisdiction of the Department, and in the surrounding
areas of the buildings and grounds in the State as described] in ACCORDANCE WITH §
4–601 of this subtitle.
(2) (i) The Secretary shall appoint the Chief of the Maryland Capitol
Police of the Department of General Services.
(ii) The Chief of the Maryland Capitol Police of the Department of
General Services serves at the pleasure of the Secretary.
(iii) The Chief of the Maryland Capitol Police of the Department of
General Services shall supervise and direct the affairs and operations of the Maryland
Capitol Police.
(3) The Maryland Capitol Police of the Department of General Services
may include sworn police officers.
(b) A member of the Maryland Capitol Police of the Department of General
Services may not be involuntarily transferred from a site to another site.
(c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, a Maryland Capitol Police officer has
all the powers granted to a peace officer and a police officer of the State.
(d) A Maryland Capitol Police officer may exercise the powers described in
subsection (c) of this section within the Department’s jurisdiction as specified in § 4–601 of
this subtitle provided the police officer:

SENATE BILL 298 5
(1) meets the legal requirements set forth by the Maryland Police Training
and Standards Commission; and
(2) is designated by the Department as a police officer.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That before a police officer of the
Maryland Capitol Police within the Department of General Services exercises the powers
granted under this Act in Baltimore City, the Maryland Capitol Police must enter a
memorandum of understanding with the Baltimore Police Department.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.